Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 6.1. Cash Match Plan.

§ 51.1-607.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

“Cash match plan”
means a plan established pursuant to the provisions of § 401 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to which a participating employer contributes based on contributions made by an employee to a deferred compensation plan or to a plan established pursuant to § 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. Alternatively, if the Board determines that it is appropriate, such plan may be established pursuant to § 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Deferred compensation plan”
means a plan described in Chapter 6 (§

51.1-600

et seq.) of this title.

“Employee”
means, in the case of the plan described in §

51.1-608

, any salaried person, including appointed or elected officials, providing services for a participating employer. In the case of a plan adopted by a county, municipality, authority or other political subdivision pursuant to §

51.1-610

, an employee shall be defined by such county, municipality, authority or other political subdivision, subject to the approval of the Board.

“Participating employer”
means the Commonwealth or any political subdivision that has elected pursuant to §

51.1-603.1

to participate in the deferred compensation plan established by the Board pursuant to Chapter 6 (§

51.1-600

et seq.) of this title or a sponsor of a plan established pursuant to § 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Qualified participant”
means, in the case of a plan established pursuant to §

51.1-608

, an employee of a participating employer who is making continuous deferrals of at least ten dollars per pay period to the deferred compensation plan established by the Board pursuant to Chapter 6 (§

51.1-600

et seq.) of this title or to a plan established pursuant to § 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The determination of whether an employee is making continuous deferrals shall be made by the Board. In the case of a plan established pursuant to subsection D of §

51.1-608

or §

51.1-610

, qualified participant means an employee described by the governing body establishing such plan in the documents setting forth the details of such plan.

History.

2002, c. 311; 2014, c. 356.

Editor’s note.

In the definition of “Qualified participant,” “subsection D of §

51.1-608

” was substituted for “subsection E of §

51.1-608

” to conform to amendments made to §

51.1-608

by Acts 2008, c. 245, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356 in the definition of “Employee” inserted “subject to the approval of the Board.”

§ 51.1-608.
Cash match plan for employees of the Commonwealth; administered by the Board.

The Board shall establish and administer a cash match plan for employees of the Commonwealth and its agencies. The Virginia Retirement System Director shall be the chief administrative officer of the plan. The Board may contract with private corporations or institutions subject to the standards set forth in §

51.1-124.30

to provide investment products as well as any other goods and services related to the administration of the cash match plan. The Virginia Retirement System is hereby authorized to perform related services including, but not limited to, providing consolidated billing, individual and collective recordkeeping and accountings, and asset purchase, control, and safekeeping. Administrative fees related to the Virginia Retirement System Program oversight shall be paid by the participating employer under procedures established by the Board.

If it deems it advisable, the Board may create a trust or other special fund for the segregation of the funds or assets resulting from contributions made on behalf of qualified participants.

The Department of Accounts shall be responsible for the timely transfer of the matching contributions to the private corporation or institution designated by the Board pursuant to subsection A. However, any state agency that has decentralized its payroll function and any political subdivision of the Commonwealth participating in the plan pursuant to §

51.1-611

shall be responsible for the timely transfer of matching contributions to the private corporation or institution designated by the Board pursuant to subsection A.

Alternatively, agencies of the Commonwealth that sponsor or maintain programs described in § 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may establish separate cash match plans with the consent of the Board in lieu of participation in the plan established pursuant to this section.

History.

2002, c. 311; 2006, c. 756; 2008, cc. 29, 245.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 756 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 29 substituted “cash match plan” for “deferred compensation plan” at the end of the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2008 amendment by c. 245 deleted former subsection D, which limited liability of the Commonwealth, and the Board of Trustees, the employees of, and the Advisory Committee of the Virginia Retirement System, and redesignated former subsection E as present D.

§ 51.1-609.
Contributions on behalf of qualified participants.

A participating employer or, on behalf of the Commonwealth, the Department of Accounts or any agency of the Commonwealth not covered under the central payroll system, shall transfer funds from its appropriations to the private corporation or institution designated to hold investments under the plan or plans adopted or established by the participating employer pursuant to § 401(a) or § 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The funds shall be held, administered and invested as provided for in the applicable document adopted for the administration of such contributions.

The amount credited on behalf of a qualified participant pursuant to this section shall not exceed, on a semimonthly basis, the lesser of fifty dollars or fifty percent of the amount that the qualified participant voluntarily contributes to the deferred compensation plan established under this chapter or to a plan established pursuant to § 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, unless otherwise determined by the General Assembly through the appropriations process. The amount credited pursuant to this section on behalf of a qualified participant who is an employee of a participating employer other than the Commonwealth shall be a discretionary amount determined by the participating employer’s governing body from time to time.

No amount shall be credited pursuant to subsection B on behalf of a qualified participant who is participating in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

if the qualified participant has not contributed the maximum amount of voluntary contributions under subdivision C 2 of §

51.1-169

.

History.

2002, c. 311; 2013, c. 463.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 added subsection C.

§ 51.1-610.
Local cash match plans.

Any county, municipality, authority, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth may by ordinance or resolution adopt and establish for itself and its employees a cash match plan. Any such cash match plan may include constitutional officers and their employees. The ordinance or resolution adopting or establishing such plan shall create or designate an appropriate board or officer to administer the plan, and shall confer upon such board or officer the authority to do all things by way of supervision, administration, and implementation of the plan, including the power to contract with private corporations or institutions for services in connection therewith.

If it deems it advisable, any county, municipality, authority, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, which by ordinance or resolution adopts and establishes for itself and its employees a cash match plan, may create a trust or other special fund for the segregation of the funds or assets resulting from contributions.

History.

2002, c. 311; 2013, c. 463; 2015, cc. 538, 539.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 538 and 539, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2016, except the provisions of subdivision G 2 of §

51.1-169

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, which shall become effective October 1, 2016.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 added subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 538 and 539, effective January 1, 2016, are identical, and deleted former subsection C, which read “No amount shall be credited pursuant to any cash match plan created pursuant to this section on behalf of a qualified participant who is participating in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

if the qualified participant has not contributed the maximum amount of voluntary contributions under subdivision C 2 of §

51.1-169

.”

§ 51.1-611.
Participation by employees of political subdivisions in cash match plan of Virginia Retirement System.

The Virginia Retirement System may enter into an agreement with any political subdivision of the Commonwealth to permit participation by the political subdivision’s employees in the cash match plan established and administered by the Board pursuant to §

51.1-607

, except that political subdivisions of the Commonwealth otherwise participating in the retirement system pursuant to Article 5 (§

51.1-130

et seq.) of Chapter 1 shall participate in the cash match plan established and administered by the Board pursuant to §

51.1-608

to the extent necessary to provide benefits under the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

.

History.

2002, c. 311; 2012, cc. 701, 823.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and added “, except that political subdivisions of the Commonwealth . . . described in §

51.1-169

.”

§ 51.1-612.
Standards for cash match plans.

No cash match plan shall become effective until the Board, county, municipality, authority or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth is satisfied, by opinion of its respective counsel, such federal agency or agencies as may be deemed necessary, or otherwise, that the contribution thereunder or the investment products purchased pursuant to the plan (i) will not be included in the employee’s taxable income under federal or state law until it is actually received by the employee under the terms of the plan and (ii) that such contribution will not be deemed compensation at the time of the contribution for the purposes of social security coverage, for the purposes of the Virginia Retirement System, and for any other retirement, pension, or benefit program established by law.

History.

2002, c. 311.

§ 51.1-613.
Other retirement, pension, etc., systems not affected; annual report.

Any cash match program established by this chapter, and any plan adopted hereunder, shall exist and serve in addition to any other retirement, pension, or benefit system established by the Commonwealth, its agencies, counties, municipalities, authority, or other political subdivisions, and shall not supersede, make inoperative, or reduce any benefits provided by the Virginia Retirement System or by any other retirement, pension, or benefit program established by law.

The Virginia Retirement System shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly advising them of the condition of the fund administered by the Virginia Retirement System and all operational costs associated with such fund.

History.

2002, c. 311.